Tennessee statutes. Title 34 Guardianship
Part 1

General Provisions

34-8-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act.”

Acts 2010, ch. 817, § 1.

34-8-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the terms shall have the same meaning as those defined in §34-1-101.

Acts 2010, ch. 817, § 1.

34-8-103. International application of chapter.

A court of this state may treat a foreign country as if it were a state for the purpose of applying this chapter.

Acts 2010, ch. 817, § 1.

34-8-104. Communication between courts.

A court of this state may communicate with a court in another state concerning a proceeding arising under this chapter. The court may allow the parties to participate in the communication. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), the court shall make a record of the communication. The record may be limited to the fact that the communication occurred.

Courts may communicate concerning schedules, calendars, court records, and other administrative matters without making a record.

Acts 2010, ch. 817, § 1.

34-8-105. Cooperation between courts.

In a conservatorship or guardianship or protective proceeding in this state, a court of this state may request the appropriate court of another state to do any of the following:

Hold an evidentiary hearing;

Order a person in that state to produce evidence or give testimony pursuant to procedures of that state;

Order that an evaluation or assessment be made of the respondent;

Order any appropriate investigation of a person involved in a proceeding;

Forward to the court of this state a certified copy of the transcript or other record of a hearing under subdivision (a)(1) or any other proceeding, any evidence otherwise produced under subdivision (a)(2), and any evaluation or assessment prepared in compliance with an order under subdivision (a)(3) or (a)(4);

Issue any order necessary to assure the appearance in the proceeding of a person whose presence is necessary for the court to make a determination, including the respondent or the incapacitated or protected person;

Issue an order authorizing the release of medical, financial, criminal, or other relevant information in that state, including protected health information as defined in 45 CFR 164.504, as amended.

If a court of another state in which a guardianship or protective proceeding is pending requests assistance of the kind provided in subsection (a), a court of this state has jurisdiction for the limited purpose of granting the request or making reasonable efforts to comply with the request.

Acts 2010, ch. 817, § 1.

34-8-106. Taking testimony in another state.

In a conservatorship or guardianship or protective proceeding, in addition to other procedures that may be available, testimony of a witness who is located in another state may be offered by deposition or other means allowable in this state for testimony taken in another state. The court on its own motion may order that the testimony of a witness be taken in another state and may prescribe the manner in which and the terms upon which the testimony is to be taken.

In a conservatorship or guardianship or protective proceeding, a court in this state may permit a witness located in another state to be deposed or to testify by telephone or audiovisual or other electronic means. A court of this state shall cooperate with the court of the other state in designating an appropriate location for the deposition or testimony.

Documentary evidence transmitted from another state to a court of this state by technological means that do not produce an original writing may not be excluded from evidence on an objection based on the best evidence rule.

Acts 2010, ch. 817, § 1.

Cross-References. Best evidence rule, see Tenn. R. Civ. P., Rules 1001, 1002.